Hawaii, session 2026, HB1744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) No later September 1, 2026, The department of human services shall: (1)  Amend the Hawaii medicaid state plan; or (2)  Request approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for an amendment under the medicaid state plan, to include coverage for naturopathic medicine under chapter 455, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (b)  The amendments shall: (1)  Authorize patients to select a naturopathic physician licensed under chapter 455, Hawaii Revised Statutes to serve as the patient's primary care provider; (2)  Ensure that the appropriate medical fee schedule shall reimburse naturopathic medical services at rates and under terms comparable to reimbursements for the practice of medicine under chapter 453, Hawaii Revised Statutes, including services for evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, preventive care, and the ongoing management of patient health consistent with existing primary care standards; and (3)  Include additional conforming amendments to eligibility, provider participation, and reimbursement provisions, if applicable. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________